Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 37.2 Sexual Assault Protective Orders

11-37.2-1.
Filing of complaint.

Proceedings under this chapter shall be filed, heard and determined in the district court of the division in which the moving party resides except when either party is a juvenile. Any proceedings under this chapter shall not preclude any other available civil or criminal remedies. A party filing a complaint under this chapter may do so without payment of any filing fee. There shall be no minimum residence requirements for the bringing of an action under this chapter.

Answers to the summons and complaint shall be made within ten (10) days of service upon the defendant and the action shall take precedence on the calendar. If no answer is filed within the time prescribed, judgment shall enter forthwith.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 236, § 2.

11-37.2-2.
Protective orders — Penalty — Jurisdiction.

A person who is a victim of sexual assault as defined in §

11-37-1

,

11-37-2

,

11-37-4

,

11-37-6

,

11-37-8.1

,

11-37-8.3

or

11-59-2

, may file a complaint in the district court requesting any order which will protect him or her from the future abuse, including, but not limited to, the following:

Ordering that the defendant be restrained and enjoined from contacting, assaulting, molesting or otherwise interfering with the plaintiff at home, on the street or elsewhere, whether the defendant is an adult or minor;

Upon motion by the plaintiff, his or her address shall be released only at the discretion of the district court judge.

Nothing in this section shall limit a defendant’s right under existing law to petition the court at a later date for modification of the order.

Any violation of the aforementioned protective order shall subject the defendant to being found in contempt of court.

The contempt order shall not be exclusive and shall not preclude any other available civil or criminal remedies. Any relief granted by the court shall be for a fixed period of time not to exceed three (3) years, at the expiration of which time the court may extend any order upon motion by the plaintiff for such additional time as it deems necessary to protect the plaintiff from abuse. The court may modify its order at any time upon motion of either party.

Any violation of a protective order under this chapter of which the defendant has actual notice shall be a misdemeanor which shall be punished by a fine of no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.

“Actual notice” means that the defendant has received a copy of the order by service thereof or by being handed a copy of the order by a police officer pursuant to §

8-8.1-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 240, § 1.

11-37.2-3.
Temporary orders — Ex parte proceedings.

Upon the filing of a complaint under this chapter, the court may enter any temporary orders that it deems necessary to protect the plaintiff from abuse.

If it clearly appears from specific facts shown by affidavit that immediate and irreparable injury, loss or damage will result to the plaintiff, before notice can be served and a hearing held, the court may enter any temporary order without notice that it deems necessary to protect the plaintiff. Every order granted without notice shall expire by its terms within the time after entry, not to exceed twenty-one (21) days, as the court fixes, unless within the time so fixed the order: (i) By consent; or (ii) Due to a failure to make service of process upon the defendant despite diligent efforts; or (iii) For good cause shown and after hearing of argument by the parties or counsel, is extended for an additional period. In case a temporary order is granted without notice, the matter shall be set down for hearing within a reasonable time and shall be given precedence over all matters except older matters of the same character, and when the matter comes on for hearing the party who obtained the temporary order shall proceed with the complaint for an order pursuant to §

11-37.2-2

, and, if he or she does not do so, the court shall dissolve the temporary order.

When the court is unavailable after the close of business a complaint may be filed before any available district court judge who may grant relief to the plaintiff under this chapter upon cause shown in an ex parte proceeding.

No temporary order shall be granted pursuant to the provisions of this section unless it clearly appears from specific facts shown by the affidavit or by verified complaint that immediate and irreparable injury, loss or damage will result to the plaintiff before notice can be served and a hearing held.

Any order issued under this section and any documentation in support of an order shall be filed immediately with the clerk of the district court. The filing shall have the effect of commencing proceedings under this chapter and invoking the other provisions of this chapter.

The clerk of the district court shall have a certified copy of any order issued under this chapter forwarded immediately to the law enforcement agency designated by the plaintiff. The clerk shall also provide the plaintiff with two (2) certified copies of any order issued under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 240, § 1.

11-37.2-4.
Report to law enforcement agency.

Whenever the court grants a temporary order pursuant to §

11-37-8.3

based on a complaint alleging that a minor is suffering from sexual abuse, the court shall ensure that the appropriate law enforcement agency is notified of the complaint.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 240, § 1.

11-37.2-5.
Return of service — Alternate service.

The complaint and any order issued under this chapter shall be personally served upon the defendant by a sheriff or constable except as provided in subsection (c), (d) and (f) of this section. Service shall be made without payment of any fee when service is made by a deputy sheriff. At the election of the plaintiff, service pursuant to this subsection may also be made by a constable licensed to serve process of the district court pursuant to §

45-16-4.1

. The constable shall be entitled to receive the fee allowed by law for the service of a district court summons.

Return of service shall be forwarded by the deputy sheriff or constable to the clerk of the court prior to the date set down for hearing on the complaint. If service has not been made, the deputy sheriff or constable shall indicate on the summons the reason therefor and the attempts made to serve the defendant.

At the time the return of service is sent to the clerk of the court, the deputy sheriff or constable shall cause a copy of the return of service to be sent to the plaintiff and to the appropriate law enforcement agency.

If, at the time of hearing on the complaint, the court determines that after diligent effort the deputy sheriff or constable has been unable to serve the defendant personally, the judge may order an alternate method of service designed to give reasonable notice of the action to the defendant and taking into consideration the plaintiff’s ability to afford the means of service ordered. Alternative service shall include, but not be limited to: service by certified and regular mail at defendant’s last known address (excluding the residence which he or she has been ordered to vacate) or place of employment, leaving copies at the defendant’s dwelling or usual place of abode with a person of suitable age and discretion residing therein, or by publication in a newspaper for two (2) consecutive weeks. The court shall set a new date for hearing on the complaint and shall extend the temporary order until that date.

If the defendant appears in person before the court, the necessity for further service is waived and proof of service of that order is not necessary.

If the defendant is served notice regarding the complaint and hearing, but does not appear at the hearing, the clerk of the district court shall mail the defendant a copy of the resulting order.

When service of the temporary order issued pursuant to this section has not been made and/or after a permanent order is entered, a police officer shall give notice of the order to the defendant by handing him or her a certified copy of the order. The officer shall indicate that he or she has given notice by writing on the plaintiff’s copy of the order and the police department’s copy of the order the date and time of giving notice and the officer’s name and badge number. The officer shall indicate on the offense report that actual notice was given.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 38.

11-37.2-6.
Notice of penalties — Notice of renewal.

Each protective order issued under this chapter, including a temporary exparte order, shall have the following statements printed in bold-faced type or in capital letters:

A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS ORDER MAY BE GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND MAY BE PUNISHED BY A FINE OF AS MUCH AS $1,000 AND/OR BY CONFINEMENT IN JAIL FOR AS LONG AS ONE YEAR, AND MAY BE ORDERED TO ATTEND COUNSELING. IF THE VICTIM WANTS THIS ORDER TO CONTINUE BEYOND THE EXPIRATION DATE, THE VICTIM MUST APPLY FOR A RENEWAL OF THE ORDER BEFORE THE EXPIRATION DATE.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 240, § 1.

11-37.2-7.
Form of complaint.

A form in substantially the following language shall suffice for the purpose of filing a complaint under this chapter:

A form in substantially the following language shall suffice for the purpose of requesting temporary orders under this chapter:

STATE OF RHODE ISLAND DISTRICT COURT COUNTY OF DIVISION Plaintiff: VS: NO: : Defendant: COMPLAINT FOR PROTECTION FROM ABUSE Pursuant to chapter 8.1 of title 8, I request that the court enter an order protecting me from abuse. (a)(1) My full name, present street address, city and telephone number are as follows: (b)(2) The full name, present street address, city and telephone number of the person causing me abuse (the defendant) are as follows: (c)(3) On or about , without cause or provocation, I suffered abuse when the defendant: [ ] Threatened or harmed with a weapon: (type of weapon used) [ ] Attempted to cause me physical harm; [ ] Caused me physical harm; [ ] Placed me in fear of imminent physical harm; [ ] Caused me to engage involuntarily in sexual relations by force, threat of force or duress; [ ] Attempted to cause me to engage involuntarily in sexual relations by force, threat of force or duress; Specifically, the defendant: (d) I ask that: [ ] The court order that the defendant be restrained and enjoined from contacting, assaulting, molesting or otherwise interfering with the plaintiff at home, on the street or elsewhere. [ ] I request that the above relief be ordered without notice because it clearly appears from specific facts shown by affidavit or by the verified complaint that I will suffer immediate and irreparable injury, loss or damage before notice can be served and a hearing had thereon. I understand that the court will schedule a hearing no later than twenty-one (21) days after such order is entered on the question of continuing such temporary order. (e) I have not sought protection from abuse from any other judge of the district court arising out of the same facts or circumstances alleged in this complaint. (Signature) (Date) Subscribed and sworn to before me in in the County of in the State of Rhode Island, this day of A.D. Notary Public Note: If this complaint is filed by an attorney, the attorney's certificate should appear below: ATTORNEY CERTIFICATE Signed: Attorney for Plaintiff Address: Date: WHITE COPY [ ] Court YELLOW COPY [ ] Plaintiff PINK COPY [ ] Defendant GOLDENROD COPY [ ] Police Department

Click to view

STATE OF RHODE ISLAND DISTRICT COURT COUNTY OF DIVISION : Plaintiff: VS: NO:

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 77, § 11, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 78, § 11, effective June 23, 2021.

11-37.2-8.
Appeal.

An order granting relief pursuant to §

8-8.1-3

shall remain in effect during the pendency of the appeal to the superior court unless the order is stayed by a justice of the superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 240, § 1.